Hawaii statutes.
§386-57 Legal status of right to
compensation and compensation payments. (a) The right to compensation
under this chapter shall not be assignable, and the right to compensation and
compensation payments received shall be exempt from the reach of creditors.

(b) The right to compensation under this
chapter shall have the same status as a lien or the same priority for the whole
thereof with respect to the assets of the employer as are accorded by law to
any unpaid wages for labor. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-56; HRS
§386-57]

Case Notes

Does not bar use of portion of lump sum payment to pay child
support arrearage. 6 H. App. 217, 716 P.2d 501 (1986).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next